Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 6. Property Settlement; Maintenance

§ 751.
Property settlement.

Upon motion of either party to a proceeding under this chapter, the court shall settle the rights of the parties to their property by including in its judgment provisions which equitably divide and assign the property. All property owned by either or both of the parties, however and whenever acquired, shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the court. Title to the property, whether in the names of either or both parties, or a nominee, shall be immaterial, except where equitable distribution can be made without disturbing separate property.

In making a property settlement, the court may consider all relevant factors, including:

The length of the civil marriage.

The age and health of the parties.

The occupation, source, and amount of income of each of the parties.

Vocational skills and employability.

The contribution by one spouse to the education, training, or increased earning power of the other.

The value of all property interests, liabilities, and needs of each party.

Whether the property settlement is in lieu of or in addition to maintenance.

The opportunity of each for future acquisition of capital assets and income. For purposes of this subdivision:

The court may consider the parties’ lifestyle and decisions made during the marriage and any other competent evidence as related to their expectations of gifts or an inheritance. The court shall not speculate as to the value of an inheritance or make a finding as to its value unless there is competent evidence of such value.

A party’s interest in an inheritance that has not yet vested and is capable of modification or divestment shall not be included in the marital estate.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision (8), a person who is not a party to the divorce shall not be subject to any subpoena to provide documentation or to give testimony about:

his or her assets, income, or net worth, unless it relates to a party’s interest in an instrument that is vested and not capable of modification or divestment; or

his or her revocable estate planning instruments, including interests that pass at death by operation of law or by contract, unless a party’s interest in an instrument is vested and not capable of modification or divestment.

This subdivision (8) shall not be construed to limit the testimony given by the parties themselves or what can be obtained through discovery of the parties.

The desirability of awarding the family home or the right to live there for reasonable periods to the spouse having custody of the children.

The party through whom the property was acquired.

The contribution of each spouse in the acquisition, preservation, and depreciation or appreciation in value of the respective estates, including the nonmonetary contribution of a spouse as a homemaker.

The respective merits of the parties.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009;

2013, No. 63

, § 1.

Division of real estate.

Family court’s property division was inequitable in awarding wife half the current equity in the marital home to be paid approximately ten or 11 years later without any provision for interest. Johnson v. Johnson, 163 Vt. 491, 659 A.2d 1149, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 44 (1995).

The division of real estate in a divorce proceeding is a final division of property and such a determination is not subject to the modification provisions applicable to alimony orders. Ellis v. Ellis, 135 Vt. 83, 370 A.2d 200, 1977 Vt. LEXIS 561 (1977).

Particular awards.

Trial court did not err in awarding a lump-sum payment of $18,000 to the wife as part of its property division award, given its finding that she was in debt because she received minimal support from the husband during the year and a half before the final divorce hearing; moreover, through the wife’s divorce complaint and trial testimony, the husband had sufficient notice that she was seeking spousal maintenance and a lump-sum cash award to help her get started following the divorce, and any error in the way the trial court framed its award was harmless. Noble v. Noble, 2020 VT 105, 213 Vt. 583, 251 A.3d 541, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 120 (2020).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in valuing and allocating the husband’s truck and tool business equipment. While the trial court could have exercised its discretion to award the truck and tool equipment to the husband at his agreed value of $75,000, the wife testified that she needed the funds from the sale of these assets to pay marital debts, so the trial court could have reasonably concluded that the best way to ensure that the equipment would be timely sold, and debts correspondingly paid down, would be to award them to the wife. Jaro v. Jaro, 2018 VT 105, 208 Vt. 391, 198 A.3d 1270, 2018 Vt. LEXIS 145 (2018).

Wife had failed to demonstrate that the trial court’s property distribution, including its award of property in lieu of maintenance, was inequitable or unjust. The trial court’s findings and conclusions demonstrated that it was well aware of the husband’s then-current income and prospects, as well as the wife’s limited income and her desire to enroll in a two-year physician’s assistant program the following fall, and it apportioned her a substantial marital estate. MacKenzie v. MacKenzie, 2017 VT 111, 206 Vt. 244, 180 A.3d 855, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 132 (2017).

Remand in an equitable distribution case was required when the court could not be sure that the trial court believed it had the discretion to distribute all of the husband’s deferred compensation earned during the marriage, including for the period after the parties separated, even if it had not vested at the time of the divorce. MacKenzie v. MacKenzie, 2017 VT 111, 206 Vt. 244, 180 A.3d 855, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 132 (2017).

Although the family court was correct to exclude trust assets from the marital estate when the husband’s father changed the beneficiary of his trust to the parties’ son, it properly considered the husband’s lifestyle and the benefits the husband derived from the trust, such as his rent-free use of his parents’ house, when dividing marital property. Collins v. Collins, 2017 VT 70, 205 Vt. 251, 173 A.3d 345, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 85 (2017).

Family court’s property division did not leave the husband in an unreasonable financial circumstance. The husband remained employed with annual wages of $52,000; the family court awarded him a car, the remaining savings of $8000 and a pending personal injury claim; and while the husband was assigned the tax debt, the family court freed him from any further obligation on the home mortgage loan or other expenses related to the marital home. Casavant v. Allen, 2016 VT 89, 202 Vt. 606, 151 A.3d 1233, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 91 (2016).

In a divorce case, the property award was not disproportionate, as the trial court was entitled to give more weight to some factors than to others and to conclude that the wife was entitled to more of the marital property than the husband, given its determination that husband had had affairs, had drank to excess, had been abusive, and had been an undisciplined spender. Casavant v. Allen, 2016 VT 89, 202 Vt. 606, 151 A.3d 1233, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 91 (2016).

Because a car belonging to the husband’s adult son did not belong to either spouse, the trial court erred in treating it as marital property. Coburn v. Cook, 2014 VT 45, 196 Vt. 410, 97 A.3d 892, 2014 Vt. LEXIS 43 (2014).

In determining that the husband of divorcing parties was to be awarded the parties’ pet dog, the treatment of the dog was an appropriate factor upon which to base the decision, as well as the dog’s welfare and its emotional relationship with the parties. Hament v. Baker, 2014 VT 39, 196 Vt. 339, 97 A.3d 461, 2014 Vt. LEXIS 36 (2014).

Allocation of a pet in a divorce is not subject to a custody award following a determination of its best interests because a pet is property; the family division must assign it to one party or the other and like other aspects of the property division, the assignment is final and generally not subject to modification. Hament v. Baker, 2014 VT 39, 196 Vt. 339, 97 A.3d 461, 2014 Vt. LEXIS 36 (2014).

Award of approximately 57 percent of the marital estate to the wife was well within the trial court’s discretion, given the wife’s homemaker role throughout the course of the long-term marriage and the fact that the wife was receiving marital property in lieu of a maintenance award. Felis v. Felis, 2013 VT 32, 193 Vt. 555, 72 A.3d 874, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 34 (2013), dismissed,
(Vt. Super. Ct. 2015).

In dividing property, the trial court did not show bias against a husband by assigning to him all of the liability associated with an aging commercial property used as a manufacturing facility for one of his businesses. In assigning the debt solely to the husband, the trial court noted the possibility of the property eventually turning a profit and also the wife’s outstanding attorney’s fee obligation beyond that awarded by the trial court. Felis v. Felis, 2013 VT 32, 193 Vt. 555, 72 A.3d 874, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 34 (2013), dismissed,
(Vt. Super. Ct. 2015).

Reversal and remand were required in a divorce case when the trial court’s property division decision was based on a mistaken understanding that the wife had agreed to the husband keeping the equity in the home and not on an equitable division of the property. Furthermore, on remand, the trial court had to provide an explanation for how it distributed the personal property. Hanson-Metayer v. Hanson-Metayer, 2013 VT 29, 193 Vt. 490, 70 A.3d 1036, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 27 (2013).

Maintenance arrearage was a debt that could be reallocated by the family court in its final decree. The family court was well within its discretion in determining that it was equitable to nullify the arrearage. Billings v. Billings, 2011 VT 116, 190 Vt. 487, 35 A.3d 1030, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 119 (2011).

Trial court properly found that a settlement agreement was equitable. It considered the parties’ lengthy marriage, the fact that the husband had a much greater ability than the wife to generate income and acquire assets, and the fact that absent the agreement, the wife would be entitled to a large maintenance award; it also provided the husband ample opportunity to present evidence regarding the financial consequences of enforcing the agreement. Camara v. Camara, 2010 VT 53, 188 Vt. 566, 998 A.2d 1058, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 50 (2010) (mem.).

In a divorce case, the trial court properly enforced the parties’ settlement agreement. The wife had unconditionally accepted the husband’s offer, and her attempt to include indemnification and mutual release provisions in a draft was not a counteroffer, but merely an attempt to modify the existing contract. Camara v. Camara, 2010 VT 53, 188 Vt. 566, 998 A.2d 1058, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 50 (2010) (mem.).

When one party’s mother owned a 50 percent interest in the couple’s house, the fundamental flaw in the family court’s equity determination was its application of the couple’s outstanding debt on the mortgage against the fair market value of the house, rather than against the value of the couple’s interest in the house. When the couple’s debt was properly accounted for, it became apparent that the couple had no equity in the house; the error was not harmless, because this “equity” was found to be the parties’ largest asset, and it was awarded to defendant along with the obligation to pay the parties’ debt to her mother. DeLeonardis v. Page, 2010 VT 52, 188 Vt. 94, 998 A.2d 1072, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 48 (2010).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in dividing the value of the parties’ assets equally when it considered the statutory factors and concluded that an equitable division would be for the wife to receive ownership of the house and the husband ownership of his business, with the payment of an equalization amount by the husband because the business was more valuable than the house. Moreover, with respect to the comparative merit of the parties, the trial court concluded that the primary cause of the marital breakup was the husband’s controlling and abusive behavior, including threats of violence. Gravel v. Gravel, 2009 VT 77, 186 Vt. 250, 980 A.2d 242, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 82 (2009).

Because the family court was in the best position to assess the merits of the parties’ contentions, and its decision addressed the relevant statutory factors, it could not be said that the court abused its discretion in fashioning the property award giving wife approximately ninety percent of the marital property. Wade v. Wade, 2005 VT 72, 178 Vt. 189, 878 A.2d 303, 2005 Vt. LEXIS 155 (2005).

Trial court did not err in considering, for distribution purposes, parties’ entire fifteen year relationship rather than only four years they were legally married, or in considering defendant’s inherited stock portfolio as a marital asset to be distributed. Wall v. Moore, 167 Vt. 580, 704 A.2d 775, 1997 Vt. LEXIS 266 (1997) (mem.).

In a divorce action, the court did not improperly award wife $12,000, a sum equal to one-third of the equity in the property, as her share in the marital home, as, although the home was given to the parties by husband’s parents to benefit their son, the contributions of each party to the marital estate were essentially equivalent. Also the parties had already divided the personal property, each receiving property of nearly equivalent value. Putnam v. Putnam, 166 Vt. 108, 689 A.2d 446, 1996 Vt. LEXIS 125 (1996).

Where trial court’s only explanation as to why former wife was awarded only 12.5 percent of the total value of marital assets at issue was the marriage was fairly short and that nearly all of the assets were originally attributable to former husband, but failed to take into account that former wife left her home state and her employment there, that she withdrew from the work force and served as homemaker for two years of the marriage, that former husband’s earning capacity was considerably greater than hers, and that she would have to find a suitable place to live since former husband was awarded the homeplace, and no specific findings as to the percentage of the increase in marital assets during the marriage were made, case was remanded for court to make a clear statement as to why the disparity in the property awarded was so significant. Dreves v. Dreves, 160 Vt. 330, 628 A.2d 558, 1993 Vt. LEXIS 54 (1993).

Property distribution in divorce action which resulted in wife receiving martial assets valued at $141,000 while husband’s share was $43,170 was not erroneous where husband benefitted materially from wife’s ownership of stock in closely held company while not contributing to enhancing its value and husband was awarded marital home, the only substantial asset joint acquired during the marriage. Goodrich v. Goodrich, 158 Vt. 587, 613 A.2d 203, 1992 Vt. LEXIS 92 (1992).

Uneven distribution of marital property in favor of wife was not an abuse of discretion where husband had opportunity to receive future income from irrevocable trust, wife had a relatively lower earning capacity, and where the respective merits of the parties supported uneven distribution. Chilkott v. Chilkott, 158 Vt. 193, 607 A.2d 883, 1992 Vt. LEXIS 36 (1992).

Where trial court in divorce action awarded marital residence to wife, subject to $25,000 lien payable to husband upon wife’s remarriage, sale of the property, or when their daughter became eighteen years of age, it abused its discretion in failing to award husband interest during the passage of time until husband realized his $25,000 share. Williams v. Williams, 158 Vt. 574, 613 A.2d 200, 1992 Vt. LEXIS 75 (1992).

Where trial court’s findings with respect to distribution of marital property provided a clear statement as to what was decided and why and evinced sufficient consideration of statutory factors, distribution which resulted in roughly a 65%-35% split in favor of husband did not amount to an abuse of discretion. Semprebon v. Semprebon, 157 Vt. 209, 596 A.2d 361, 1991 Vt. LEXIS 165 (1991).

Where trial court in divorce action ordered that the former wife be awarded 8.4 acres of a 14.4-acre parcel of real estate acquired during the marriage and that the remaining 6 acres, divided into three 2-acre parcels with a suitable right of way be awarded to the former husband, sold, and the proceeds invested and the interest used to pay child support, since there was no evidence that the parcel could be divided into one 8.4 and three 2-acre lots, the 2-acre parcels had not been surveyed, the necessary easement had not been laid out, none of the sites had been checked to determine if they had a sufficient water supply or to ascertain the feasibility of installing septic system, and the sale of the lots would be subject to zoning approval which had not been applied for, the trial court’s order was incapable of performance an, therefore, constituted an abuse of discretion. Atwood v. Atwood, 143 Vt. 298, 465 A.2d 1354, 1983 Vt. LEXIS 517 (1983).

Action of trial court, in dividing the property of the parties in a divorce proceeding by awarding the home and furnishings of the parties, valued at $25,000 to the husband and awarding the wife only $5,000 deferred payment for her interest in the property, did not constitute an abuse of discretion in light of the husband’s preponderance of contribution to the existing equity and the burden of support left to him under the divorce decree and in light of the infidelities and misconduct of the wife. Jackson v. Jackson, 139 Vt. 548, 432 A.2d 1181, 1981 Vt. LEXIS 525 (1981).

Where, in divorce proceeding, wife received homestead and furnishings valued at $45,000, securities and bank accounts valued at $15,000 and $4,800 alimony, and husband received securities worth $11,000, 1971 Oldsmobile, note with $76,000 due on it, which was of doubtful value, hunting camp valued at $10,000 but encumbered by $5,300 mortgage, and part ownership of resort valued at $20,000 but with a $24,000 mortgage encumbrance on it, and, though both husband and wife had contributed to increased value of homestead and property with $76,000 note on it husband had originally contributed both to the marriage, property distribution was not an abuse of discretion. Hogel v. Hogel, 136 Vt. 195, 388 A.2d 369, 1978 Vt. LEXIS 758 (1978).

Where alimony and child support order gave wife all but $222.798 a week of husband’s monthly salary of $893.05 and it appeared that husband had no other income, the order appeared on its face to be inequitable and perhaps impossible of compliance, and where there were no findings the cause would be remanded for a rehearing, the preparation of findings, and a new alimony, child support and property disposition order, and that appellant husband had not requested findings did not prevent the grant of relief. Cleary v. Cleary, 134 Vt. 181, 353 A.2d 334, 1976 Vt. LEXIS 625 (1976).

Where parties in divorce action had real estate worth $30,000 and husband was awarded a $143,000 tort settlement during the action of loss of future earnings, incurred in motorcycle accident, and wife had minimal education, few employment skills and was granted custody of three minor children, award to wife $12,500 for her interest in real estate and $8,500 lump sum in lieu of alimony was within courts’ discretion. Bero v. Bero, 134 Vt. 533, 367 A.2d 165, 1976 Vt. LEXIS 722 (1976).

Order for equal division of property of divorced parties would be overturned where lower court had concluded that the absence of liquidity placed both parties in a very precarious financial position and therefore the properties should be equally divided, for neither the absence of liquidity nor the precarious financial position of the parties justified the equal division and neither was contained in this section stating what the court should consider when disposing of property; and the order would be overturned even though the same result might have been reached without the improper conclusion and even though statutory factors was considered, where the absence of liquidity apparently received greater consideration. Young v. Young, 134 Vt. 87, 349 A.2d 225, 1975 Vt. LEXIS 337 (1975).

Property division and alimony order giving wife homestead and husband cottage, ordering husband to make $16,500 remaining mortgage payments and keep up life and health insurance policies with wife as beneficiary, and ordering husband, who had net after tax income of over $33,000 the previous year, to pay wife, who had net after tax income of over $33,000 the previous year, the pay wife, who had no job training and a very minor income, $1,000 alimony per month, would stand where not shown to be an abuse or withholding of the trial court’s wide discretion. Peisch v. Peisch, 132 Vt. 514, 321 A.2d 67, 1974 Vt. LEXIS 380 (1974).

Husband was erroneously awarded the real estate of parties to divorce where evidence clearly established a 50-50 partnership between them. Mandigo v. Mandigo, 128 Vt. 446, 266 A.2d 434, 1970 Vt. LEXIS 252 (1970).

§ 752.
Maintenance.

In an action under this chapter, the court may order either spouse to make maintenance payments, either rehabilitative or long term in nature, to the other spouse if it finds that the spouse seeking maintenance:

lacks sufficient income or property, or both, including property apportioned in accordance with section 751 of this title, to provide for his or her reasonable needs; and

is unable to support himself or herself through appropriate employment at the standard of living established during the civil marriage or is the custodian of a child of the parties.

The maintenance order shall be in such amounts and for such periods of time as the court deems just, after considering all relevant factors, including:

the financial resources of the party seeking maintenance, the property apportioned to the party, the party’s ability to meet his or her needs independently, and the extent to which a provision for support of a child living with the party contains a sum for that party as custodian;

the time and expense necessary to acquire sufficient education or training to enable the party seeking maintenance to find appropriate employment;

the standard of living established during the civil marriage;

the duration of the civil marriage;

the age and the physical and emotional condition of each spouse;

the ability of the spouse from whom maintenance is sought to meet his or her reasonable needs while meeting those of the spouse seeking maintenance;

inflation with relation to the cost of living;

the impact of both parties reaching the age of eligibility to receive full retirement benefits under Title II of the federal Social Security Act or the parties’ actual retirement, including any expected discrepancies in federal Social Security Retirement benefits; and

PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>the following guidelines:

Click to view

PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>Length of marriage % of the difference Duration of alimony award PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”> between parties’ as % length of marriage PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”> gross incomes PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>0 to <5 years 0-16% No alimony PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”> or short-term alimony PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”> up to one year PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>5 to <10 years 12-29% 20-50% (1-5 yrs) PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>10 to <15 years 16-33% 40-60% (4-9 yrs) PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>15 to <20 years 20-37% 40-70% (6-14 yrs) PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>20+ years 24-41% 45% (9-20+ yrs)

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009;

2017, No. 60

, § 2, eff. June 5, 2017;

2019, No. 40

, § 6;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 300.

Form of payment.

Court in its discretion could decree alimony to be paid in money, though bill prayed that it be satisfied out of real estate. Foster v. Foster, 56 Vt. 540, 1884 Vt. LEXIS 90 (1884) (Decided under

15 V.S.A. § 6754

prior to 1981 (Adj. Sess.) amendment.).

Particular awards.

Award of nominal maintenance was within the trial court’s discretion when the trial court imposed the nominal maintenance award in the event unanticipated circumstances justified a later maintenance award——specifically that the husband would come out of retirement and again begin earning substantial income. Felis v. Felis, 2013 VT 32, 193 Vt. 555, 72 A.3d 874, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 34 (2013), dismissed,
(Vt. Super. Ct. 2015).

When the family court made a combined property and maintenance award that provided the wife with an income stream of essentially the same amount per month from the date of the divorce and indefinitely thereafter, the awards were to be viewed as a package. The family court did this by providing the full monthly amount through maintenance until the anticipated date of the husband’s retirement and thereafter through retirement pension income supplemented by a small amount of maintenance. Molleur v. Molleur, 2012 VT 16, 191 Vt. 202, 44 A.3d 763, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 15 (2012).

Family court did not err in awarding permanent maintenance to the wife. The evidence plainly demonstrated that the wife had extremely limited financial prospects, in marked contrast to the husband, and would need financial assistance to live independently or even approach the standard of living established during the marriage. Molleur v. Molleur, 2012 VT 16, 191 Vt. 202, 44 A.3d 763, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 15 (2012).

Family court was required to amend its automatic inflation-adjustment provision, which stated that the $500 permanent maintenance award to the wife be increased automatically every three years “by 7.5%, or 3 times the annual CPI index for the most recent year, whichever is greater.” The family court’s formula did not actually track inflationary increases in the cost of living and did not take into account the possibility that the husband’s income might fail to keep pace with the inflationary increases. Molleur v. Molleur, 2012 VT 16, 191 Vt. 202, 44 A.3d 763, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 15 (2012).

Family court plainly relied on its property allocation in declining to award spousal maintenance to defendant; it noted that she had received a favorable apportionment of the assets of the marriage. In view of the court’s determination that the family court erred in apportioning the couple’s property, the maintenance decision had to be vacated and remanded. DeLeonardis v. Page, 2010 VT 52, 188 Vt. 94, 998 A.2d 1072, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 48 (2010).

In a divorce case, the husband had a good prospect of continuing to grow his business and, therefore, his income, while the wife’s opportunities for advancement were very limited. Because the trial court considered the 13-year length of the marriage, the role the wife played during the marriage, and the income she was likely to obtain in relation to the standard of living set in the marriage, and designed an award to achieve the appropriate purposes of maintenance, the time-limited award of maintenance to the wife was just in light of all the facts and circumstances of this case and within the trial court’s discretion. Gravel v. Gravel, 2009 VT 77, 186 Vt. 250, 980 A.2d 242, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 82 (2009).

After excluding the property award from husband’s monthly expenses, the trial court did roughly equalize the parties’ living standards in its maintenance award to the wife; offsetting the husband’s property equalization payments against maintenance would give the husband, who had been awarded the entire ownership of his business, double credit for paying his obligation. Further, because of the increased cost of maintaining two households post-divorce, it was only reasonable that both parties had to lower their expenses and standard of living; while the reasonable needs of a party were determined in light of the standard of living established during the marriage, if the income of the parties was unable to support that standard of living, both parties had to lower their expenses and adjust accordingly. Gravel v. Gravel, 2009 VT 77, 186 Vt. 250, 980 A.2d 242, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 82 (2009).

There was no merit to a husband’s argument that the trial court erred in not awarding the wife ownership of his business in lieu of maintenance. While the family court had the discretion to make an award of property in lieu of maintenance, it was not required to do so; here, the trial court could have concluded that leaving the husband and the wife joined in a business relationship was untenable. Gravel v. Gravel, 2009 VT 77, 186 Vt. 250, 980 A.2d 242, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 82 (2009).

Wife had failed to show that the family court abused its broad discretion in arriving at its maintenance award. For the most part, the wife failed to direct the trial court to the maintenance issues she raised for the first time in her cross-appeal. Drumheller v. Drumheller, 2009 VT 23, 185 Vt. 417, 972 A.2d 176, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 27 (2009).

Where husband was awarded stock options worth over $1,400,000, many of which were vested, and it was reasonable to expect that these assets would earn income, this income was required to be considered in determining an appropriate maintenance award. Golden v. Cooper-Ellis, 2007 VT 15, 181 Vt. 359, 924 A.2d 19, 2007 Vt. LEXIS 41 (2007).

Where the family court awarded no child support but awarded spousal support up to specified dates, the court’s failure to make a separate child support award made it impossible to determine the amount actually intended for maintenance, and whether there was a reasonable basis to support it. Weaver v. Weaver, 173 Vt. 512, 790 A.2d 1125, 2001 Vt. LEXIS 381 (2001) (mem.).

Family court did not abuse its discretion in limiting wife’s award of permanent maintenance to payment of her health insurance; there was no need for precise specification of the parties’ living standard and, contrary to wife’s argument, court did consider interrelationship between its property award and the need for maintenance. Stalb v. Stalb, 168 Vt. 235, 719 A.2d 421, 1998 Vt. LEXIS 248 (1998).

Family court did not abuse its discretion in denying mother permanent maintenance and awarding her rehabilitative maintenance for a period of eight years, where mother was an intelligent and sophisticated person who had been able to develop business skills outside of home, was still relatively young and not burdened by ill health, standard of living during marriage had been modest, and court concluded that mother would eventually succeed on her own, either in her own business or other employment, to achieve an independent middle class lifestyle. Begins v. Begins, 168 Vt. 298, 721 A.2d 469, 1998 Vt. LEXIS 254 (1998).

Trial court did not exceed its discretion in declining to award spousal maintenance to defendant based on its conclusion that maintenance was inappropriate since standard of living enjoyed by both parties exceeded that experienced during majority of marriage, and since there was no significant disparity in earning potential between parties. Wall v. Moore, 167 Vt. 580, 704 A.2d 775, 1997 Vt. LEXIS 266 (1997) (mem.).

There was a reasonable basis for the court’s decision to award maintenance and findings regarding the reasonable needs of plaintiff were sufficient to support a mere $500 a month maintenance award because plaintiff’s need to resort to public assistance demonstrated an obvious lack of personal income, property, or both, thereby justifying a maintenance award under

15 V.S.A. § 752(a)

. Kohut v. Kohut, 164 Vt. 40, 663 A.2d 942, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 60 (1995).

Where plaintiff submitted her child support guideline information she had supplied in support of the temporary award of $600 per month, the findings that the couple enjoyed an income of $65,000 per year during the marriage, that plaintiff required welfare assistance after the marriage, and that plaintiff’s income would never equal defendant’s were adequate to support the $500 per month maintenance award against an attack by defendant, who benefited from such a nominal award. Kohut v. Kohut, 164 Vt. 40, 663 A.2d 942, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 60 (1995).

In context of divorce decree awarding wife 50 percent of husband’s retirement and social security benefits, relevant provision established a clear overall scheme under which wife’s 50 percent share of husband’s benefits on the date of the 1984 order accrued, that is, was fixed and established as a base, and the word accrue was intended to refer to amounts credited to that base. Sachs v. Sachs, 163 Vt. 498, 659 A.2d 678, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 45 (1995).

Date of 1984 order was focal date after which
retirement benefits attributable to the parties’ marriage were to be calculated and set as a base, with benefits to be calculated and awarded upon the husband’s subsequent retirement. Sachs v. Sachs, 163 Vt. 498, 659 A.2d 678, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 45 (1995).

The 1984 order, allowing wife to share in 50 percent of any increase or decrease in husband’s retirement benefits accrued to August 1, 1984, and caused by market fluctuations, acknowledged that the future might enhance or diminish wife’s base and the risks were to be shared; contrary to husband’s argument, use of the word “fluctuations” implied growth. Sachs v. Sachs, 163 Vt. 498, 659 A.2d 678, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 45 (1995).

Husband’s argument that, because 1984 divorce order treated his retirement benefits as income for purposes of determining alimony and not as marital property, wife was not entitled to any growth in the base amount was misplaced since ultimately it was the agreement terms, and not the characterization of the benefit, that determined the allocation of growth in the value of the retirement account between the date of the 1984 order and the date of retirement. Sachs v. Sachs, 163 Vt. 498, 659 A.2d 678, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 45 (1995).

The family court erred in calculating wife’s portion of husband’s retirement benefits as if husband had retired in 1990 at age sixty-five, rather than upon his actual retirement in 1993 at age sixty-eight. Sachs v. Sachs, 163 Vt. 498, 659 A.2d 678, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 45 (1995).

The family court erred in basing wife’s portion of husband’s retirement benefits on the $814 figure recited in the 1984 order as the possible or likely total monthly benefit, rather than on the total actual appreciated value of the account at the date of retirement; figures in that order were merely examples of potential appreciation at different retirement ages. Sachs v. Sachs, 163 Vt. 498, 659 A.2d 678, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 45 (1995).

Parties’ opting for their own version of the deferred distribution or reserved jurisdiction method of distributing a spouse’s pension, rather than the immediate offset method, negated suggestion that parties intended to match pre- and post-retirement alimony amounts; the election implied potential benefits and detriments to both parties, insulating wife from the vagaries of husband’s decision as to when to retire, and husband benefiting in not having to pay an immediate lump sum to wife but rather paying a fixed dollar amount while employed and a post-retirement amount based on the fortunes of the retirement account. Sachs v. Sachs, 163 Vt. 498, 659 A.2d 678, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 45 (1995).

Under the terms of 1984 divorce order, Social Security payments to which wife was entitled should have been based on the value of the Social Security account on the date of husband’s retirement in 1993 at age sixty-eight. Sachs v. Sachs, 163 Vt. 498, 659 A.2d 678, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 45 (1995).

Trial court erred in requiring husband to pledge his interest in his law firm or purchase life insurance policy in equivalent amount in order to secure maintenance payments to wife in event husband died before his retirement age of sixty-five years because court order attempted to effect indirectly, through life insurance, what

15 V.S.A. § 752

does not mandate directly, continuation of maintenance after death of party. Clapp v. Clapp, 163 Vt. 15, 653 A.2d 72, 1994 Vt. LEXIS 174 (1994).

Where, prior to separation, couple was living on after-tax income of approximately $130,000 per year and spending most of it, $33,000 was attributable to wife, both parties attained maximum vocational skills and employability, and husband’s earning capacity would grow at faster rate as he approached retirement, trial court acted within its discretion in awarding maintenance of $1,000 per month to wife. Clapp v. Clapp, 163 Vt. 15, 653 A.2d 72, 1994 Vt. LEXIS 174 (1994).

Trial court’s finding that defendant was entitled only to rehabilitative maintenance since she would be able to obtain some sort of job was not supported by sufficient findings because there was no finding that the job would produce an income that would enable defendant to live at the standard established during the marriage, nor was there any consideration of defendant’s long-term contribution as a homemaker and primary caretaker of the children. Strauss v. Strauss, 160 Vt. 335, 628 A.2d 552, 1993 Vt. LEXIS 58 (1993).

Trial court did not abuse discretion by awarding maintenance to husband in divorce decree, equalizing parties’ income during wife’s lifetime while giving wife substantial assets, since wife was party through whom property was acquired and maintenance award balanced decree. Johnson v. Johnson, 158 Vt. 160, 605 A.2d 857, 1992 Vt. LEXIS 32 (1992).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in determining future value of professional degree in both amount and duration of maintenance award; court considered value of future benefits to be derived from degree, anticipated expenses to be incurred in obtaining those benefits, parties’ incomes employability, duration of marriage, and most importantly, court focused on standards of living enjoyed by parties. Downs v. Downs, 159 Vt. 467, 621 A.2d 229, 1993 Vt. LEXIS 8 (1993).

Trial court properly awarded permanent maintenance to homemaker wife in divorce proceeding, where there existed at the time of the first hearing a vast inequality between the parties’ financial positions, wife’s health was poor, wife’s prospects for even remotely approaching husband’s earning capacity were slim, and this section specifically permitted trial court to award permanent maintenance as it deemed just. Russell v. Russell, 157 Vt. 295, 597 A.2d 798, 1991 Vt. LEXIS 182 (1991).

Rehabilitative maintenance award of ten years’ duration was not an abuse of the trial court’s discretion to impose time limit on award where recipient, a former school teacher who had been a full-time homemaker during most of the sixteen-year marriage, would find her overall income eroded by inflation unless she obtained employment with an increasing salary. Johnson v. Johnson, 155 Vt. 36, 580 A.2d 503, 1990 Vt. LEXIS 131 (1990).

Defendant failed to show there was no reasonable basis for rehabilitative maintenance award of $1,500 for a ten-year period to plaintiff who had an earning potential of $17,700 as a school teacher but who lacked sufficient income to provide for her reasonable needs in light of the standard of living established during her marriage to physician defendant. Johnson v. Johnson, 155 Vt. 36, 580 A.2d 503, 1990 Vt. LEXIS 131 (1990).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in award to 55-year-old, unemployed wife of permanent maintenance of $700 per month, despite finding that her monthly living expenses were approximately $1500 and earning potential approximately $1200; award was necessary to keep plaintiff in standard of living established during the marriage, defendant’s earning capacity greatly exceeded that of plaintiff, who had not worked outside the home for many years and who would lose social security disability payments if she went to work and during marriage wife had substantially contributed to husband’s education. Chaker v. Chaker, 155 Vt. 20, 581 A.2d 737, 1990 Vt. LEXIS 121 (1990).